Massachusetts, session 194th, H5084.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of section seventeen of chapter one hundred and thirty-
eight of the General Laws, the licensing authority of the Town of Bourne is hereby authorized to
grant to Sea State Foods, LLC, Patrick Ross, Manager, d/b/a Cataumet Fish, a non-transferable,
annual license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises under the
provisions of section fifteen of said chapter one hundred and thirty-eight. Said license shall be
subject to all the provisions of said chapter one hundred and thirty-eight except said section
seventeen.
of 1